Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1805
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 71-1801 to 71-1804 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1943, c. 153, § 5, p. 562;

R.S.1943, § 71-1805;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 162;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 582.